Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB4.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. On and after January 1, 2026, K.S.A. 25-1132 is hereby
amended to read as follows: 25-1132. (a) All advance voting ballots
that are received in the office of the county election officer or any
polling place within the county not later than the hour for closing of the
polls on the date of any election specified in K.S.A. 25-1122(f), and
amendments thereto, shall be delivered by the county election officer to
the appropriate special election board provided for in K.S.A. 25-1133,
and amendments thereto.
(b) Subject to the deadline for receipt by the office of the county
election officer as set forth in this subsection, all advance voting ballots
received by mail by the office of the county election officer after the
closing of the polls on the date of any election specified in K.S.A. 25-
1122(f), and amendments thereto, and which are postmarked or are
otherwise indicated by the United States postal service to have been
mailed on or before the close of the polls on the date of the election,
shall be delivered by the county election officer to a special election
board or the county board of canvassers, as determined by the secretary
of state, for canvassing in a manner consistent, as nearly as may be,
with other advance voting ballots. The deadline for the receipt by mail
of the advance voting ballots by the office of the county election officer
shall be the last delivery of mail by the United States postal service
7:00 p.m. on the third day following the date of the election.
(c) The secretary of state shall adopt rules and regulations to
implement this subsection section.
Sec. 2. On and after January 1, 2026, K.S.A. 25-1132 is hereby
repealed.

SENATE BILL No. 4—page 2
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the
SENATE, and passed that body
__________________________
SENATE concurred in
_______________________
HOUSE amendments
_________________________
President of the Senate.
_________________________
Secretary of the Senate.
Passed the HOUSE
_________________________
as amended
_________________________
Speaker of the House.
_________________________
Chief Clerk of the House.
_____________________________
APPROVED
_________________________
Governor.